Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2910
Financial assistance; contracts; instruments.

The investment program may make any contract and execute any instrument that is necessary or convenient to provide financial assistance, including any:

(1) Loan agreement, trust indenture, intercept agreement, or reimbursement agreement;

(2) Acceptance of a pledge of project revenue, special assessment, user fee, tax increment, or other legally available revenue;

(3) Requirement or funding of any reserve fund to secure repayment; or

(4) Participation in any pooled financing or senior-subordinate structure.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 10.
July 18, 2026